Louisiana, session 2026, HB1098.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 9:2800.31 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2800.31. Aerospace flight entities and activities; limitation of liability
A. For purposes of this Section, the following definitions apply:
(1) "Aerospace flight activities" mean any act or activity related to the
research, development, testing, manufacture, preparation, launch, operation, reentry,
descent, landing, or post-landing recovery of an aeronautic or astronautic launch
vehicle, craft, payload, or related equipment, including but not limited to fueling,
integration, conditioning, and transporting, including but not limited to the transport
of goods and persons, and any associated ground support operations, whether
conducted on-site or involving overflight.
(2) "Aerospace flight entity" means any person, corporation, partnership,
limited liability company, or any other entity that conducts aerospace flight activities
and, to the extent required by federal law, holds or operates anywhere under a valid
Federal Aviation Administration license, experimental permit, or other authorization
for the relevant activities requiring such a license. This also includes any employee,
officer, director, agent, contractor, manufacturer, supplier, or vendor of such entity,
any owner or lessor of immovable property used for aerospace flight activities, and
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1098 ENROLLED
any political subdivision or public entity with a contractual or operational
relationship facilitating such activities.
B. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, no aerospace
flight entity that owns and occupies a minimum of twenty thousand contiguous acres
in this state shall be liable for any cause of action arising from nuisance, trespass,
inverse condemnation, strict liability, or any other claim based upon noise, sonic
booms, overflight, vibration, light, heat, exhaust, smoke, odor, visual intrusion,
temporary access restrictions, or any other disturbance resulting from aerospace
flight activities.
C. An aerospace flight entity shall not be liable to any aerospace flight
participant for any injury or damages resulting from aerospace flight activities if the
aerospace flight participant has signed an agreement and given written consent as
required by 51 U.S.C. 50905.
D. The limitations provided in this Section do not apply to any of the
following:
(1) The gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct of the aerospace
flight entity.
(2) Intentional injury caused by the aerospace flight entity to the aerospace
flight participant.
(3) A violation of a condition of a Federal Aviation Administration license,
experimental permit, or federal authorization,
(4) Injury to persons or property caused by falling debris that exceeds the
normal risk associated with aerospace flight activities.
E. A reciprocal waiver of claims between parties engaged in aerospace flight
activities under Federal Aviation Administration Regulations (14 CFR 440.17) is
effective and enforceable in this state, including waiver by a contractor,
subcontractor, or customer of any party participating in an aerospace flight activity.
F. An aerospace flight entity is presumed to be acting lawfully if the
aerospace activity is conducted in substantial compliance with applicable federal,
state, and local licenses, permits, or authorizations.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1098 ENROLLED
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.